Hawaii statutes.
§490:4-208 Presentment warranties.
(a) If an unaccepted draft is presented to the drawee for payment or
acceptance and the drawee pays or accepts the draft:

(1) The person obtaining payment or acceptance, at
the time of presentment; and

(2) A previous transferor of the draft, at the time
of transfer, warrant to the drawee that pays or accepts the draft in good faith
that:

(A) The warrantor is, or was, at the time the
warrantor transferred the draft, a person entitled to enforce the draft or
authorized to obtain payment or acceptance of the draft on behalf of a person
entitled to enforce the draft;

(B) The draft has not been altered;

(C) The warrantor has no knowledge that the
signature of the purported drawer of the draft is unauthorized; and

(D) If the draft is a demand draft, creation
of the demand draft according to the terms on its face was authorized by the
person identified as drawer.

(b) A drawee making payment may recover from a
warrantor damages for breach of warranty equal to the amount paid by the drawee
less the amount the drawee received or is entitled to receive from the drawer
because of the payment. In addition, the drawee is entitled to compensation
for expenses and loss of interest resulting from the breach. The right of the
drawee to recover damages under this subsection is not affected by any failure
of the drawee to exercise ordinary care in making payment. If the drawee
accepts the draft:

(1) Breach of warranty is a defense to the obligation
of the acceptor; and

(2) If the acceptor makes payment with respect to the
draft, the acceptor is entitled to recover from a warrantor for breach of
warranty the amounts stated in this subsection.

(c) If a drawee asserts a claim for breach of
warranty under subsection (a) based on an unauthorized indorsement of the draft
or an alteration of the draft, the warrantor may defend by proving that the
indorsement is effective under section 490:3-404 or 490:3-405 or the drawer is
precluded under section 490:3-406 or 490:4-406 from asserting against the
drawee the unauthorized indorsement or alteration.

(d) If:

(1) A dishonored draft is presented for payment to
the drawer or an indorser; or

(2) Any other item is presented for payment to a
party obliged to pay the item, and the item is paid, the person obtaining
payment and a prior transferor of the item warrant to the person making payment
in good faith that the warrantor is, or was, at the time the warrantor
transferred the item, a person entitled to enforce the item or authorized to obtain
payment on behalf of a person entitled to enforce the item. The person making
payment may recover from any warrantor for breach of warranty an amount equal
to the amount paid plus expenses and loss of interest resulting from the
breach.

(e) The warranties stated in subsections (a)
and (d) cannot be disclaimed with respect to checks. Unless notice of a claim
for breach of warranty is given to the warrantor within thirty days after the
claimant has reason to know of the breach and the identity of the warrantor,
the warrantor is discharged to the extent of any loss caused by the delay in
giving notice of the claim.

(f) A cause of action for breach of warranty
under this section accrues when the claimant has reason to know of the breach.

(g) A demand check is a check, as provided in
section 490:3-104(f). [L 1991, c 118, pt of §4; am L 1998, c 241, §6]

Note

This section is new. Former §490:4-208 renumbered as
§490:4-210.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next